Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
CHAPTER 7B Long-Term Policy Research

7B.010.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that:

The growing complexity and interdependence of the modern world, demonstrated by such issues as global environmental change, changing workforce development needs, the aging population, international trade, the number of working poor, the need for improved access to health care, and the emergence of fundamental changes in the role of government, require that government decision-makers consider the long-term changes affecting the welfare of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and bring these factors to bear upon public policy;

There is a need to coordinate state government’s information resources to provide a systematic and comprehensive use of that information to guide policymakers concerning critical trends and alternative futures;

To effect a prosperous future for the Commonwealth and its citizens, it is necessary for changes to occur in the way decisions are made in government so policymakers can consider the long-term implications of decisions and address emerging issues so the Commonwealth can take advantage of opportunities, avoid problems, and provide for continuity in policy; and

It is necessary to establish mechanisms to bring all perspectives into the decision-making process to evaluate information, focus attention on areas in which information is inadequate, and identify critical trends and alternative futures based upon the best available information.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 103, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Legislative Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 200, Pt. I, A, 1, (3) at 1764.

7B.020.
Kentucky Long-Term Policy Research Center — Status — Executive director.

The Kentucky Long-Term Policy Research Center is hereby established. The center shall be governed by a board with representation from the executive and legislative branches of state government and the private and civic sectors, universities, and local governments.

The center shall be an agency and instrumentality of the Kentucky General Assembly.

The board shall employ and fix the compensation of an executive director who shall be its secretary and principal executive officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 103, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

7B.030.
Board — Membership — Terms — Removal — Vacancies — Vote required to act.

The board of the Kentucky Long-Term Policy Research Center shall consist of twenty-one (21) members, including ten (10) members selected from state government and eleven (11) at-large members selected from the private and civic sectors, universities, and local governments.

State government members shall be appointed as follows:

Two (2) members of the House of Representatives shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and one (1) member of the minority party in the House of Representatives shall be appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the House of Representatives. Two (2) members of the Senate shall be appointed by the President of the Senate and one (1) member of the minority party in the Senate shall be appointed by the Minority Floor Leader in the Senate; and

Four (4) members from the executive branch shall be appointed by the Governor.

At-large members shall be appointed as follows:

Five (5) members shall be appointed by the Legislative Research Commission; and

Six (6) members shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the House of Representatives and the Senate;

Persons appointed may serve prior to confirmation, but shall continue to serve only if confirmed at the next regular session, or special session if the matter is included in the call therefor of the General Assembly;

The provisions of KRS

11.160

shall apply to Senate and House of Representatives confirmation of at-large members appointed by the Governor.

Board members shall serve four (4) year terms, except initial appointments shall be for terms as follows:

The Legislative Research Commission shall initially appoint two (2) legislators for terms of two (2) years, two (2) legislators for terms of three (3) years and two (2) legislators for terms of four (4) years; and shall initially appoint one (1) at-large member for a two (2) year term, two (2) at-large members for three (3) year terms, and two (2) at-large members for four (4) year terms.

The Governor shall initially appoint two (2) members from the executive branch for terms of two (2) years, one (1) for a three (3) year term, and one (1) for a four (4) year term, and shall initially appoint two (2) at-large members for terms of two (2) years, two (2) for three (3) year terms, and two (2) for four (4) year terms.

Members of the board shall meet the same age and state residency requirements as provided in Section 32 of the Kentucky Constitution for members of the House of Representatives, shall represent the cultural diversity of Kentucky, and shall have demonstrated an interest in the well-being and development of the Commonwealth.

The chair shall be elected annually by the board and shall alternate between the members selected from state government and the at-large members. If the chair is a member selected from state government, the vice chair shall be an at-large member, and if the chair is an at-large member, the vice chair shall be a member selected from state government.

Board members who miss three (3) consecutive meetings may be removed from the board by a majority vote of the board at any regularly scheduled meeting in which a quorum is present. The position shall then be declared vacant and shall be filled in the same manner as it was originally appointed.

If vacancies are not filled by the original appointing authority within thirty (30) days of the occurrence of the vacancy, the board may fill the vacancy.

A majority of the entire membership of the board shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the board shall be by vote of a majority of its entire membership.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 103, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 39, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 185, § 9, effective March 31, 2003.

7B.040.
Powers of board.

The board may:

Use studies, surveys, plans, data, and other materials in the possession of any state agency. Upon request by the board, an agency shall make materials available to the board;

Promulgate, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, administrative regulations necessary to carry out its planning and advisory functions as provided by this chapter;

Conduct public hearings in furtherance of its general purposes at places designated by the board, at which it may request the appearance of officials of any state agency and solicit the testimony of interested groups and the general public;

Establish advisory committees to assist in implementing the requirements of this chapter;

Enter into contracts, pursuant to KRS Chapters 45 and 45A, necessary for the administration of this chapter;

Disburse moneys accruing to the center’s restricted agency fund account to pay for the expenses and operation of the center and to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Engage consultants, actuaries, managers, legal counsel, and auditors, to render professional, managerial, and technical assistance, as needed;

Enter into agreements, as necessary, with any institution of higher education, the Commonwealth of Kentucky, any state or federal agency, or other entity;

Solicit and accept grants, gifts, legislative appropriations, or other moneys from the Commonwealth, any unit of federal, state, or local government, or any other person, firm, partnership, or corporation.

At the request of the board, officials or personnel of any state agency, as well as any other person, may serve on advisory committees created by the board. State officials or personnel may serve on the committees without forfeiture of office or employment, and with no loss or diminution in the compensation, status, rights, and privileges they otherwise enjoy.

Members of the board who are otherwise compensated by the Commonwealth shall receive no additional compensation as members of the board or for attendance at meetings. Members who are not otherwise compensated by the Commonwealth shall receive a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for attendance at each board meeting.

All board members may be reimbursed for travel and other expenses incurred in carrying out board responsibilities. The scope of travel shall not be limited to the confines of the Commonwealth, but may extend to any place outside the Commonwealth, if authorized by the board by motion, resolution, or directive reciting the destination, necessity, and persons authorized to travel.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 103, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

7B.050.
Term and powers of executive director — Employees.

The executive director of the Kentucky Long-Term Policy Research Center shall serve at the pleasure of the center’s board.

The executive director may employ staff, incur travel and other miscellaneous expenses, and authorize staff travel as necessary to carry out the duties of the center, within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available to it.

Employees of the center shall be employees of the legislative department and shall be exempted from classified service, but entitled to the same benefits as other employees of the Commonwealth.

With approval of the board, the executive director may enter into agreements with any state agency or political subdivision of the state, any institution of higher education, or any other person or entity to enlist staff assistance to implement the provisions of this chapter.

The executive director shall supervise the allocation of the work and activities of all employees of the center.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 103, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

7B.060.
Purpose of center — Statewide scanning program — Biennial trends report — Other duties.

The purpose of the Kentucky Long-Term Policy Research Center is to serve as a catalyst to change the way decisions are made in government by providing decision-makers a broader context in which to make decisions, taking into consideration the long-term implications of policy, critical trends, and emerging issues which may have a significant impact on the state.

At the direction of the board, the center shall:

Establish a statewide scanning program to review information sources and identify emerging issues for the Commonwealth, and regularly provide the program’s findings to the legislative and executive branches;

Prepare biennially a report on trends in the Commonwealth and the long-term implications of those trends;

As part of the report, sponsor a public forum to review the findings of the trends report and obtain reactions from executive branch agencies, legislative committees, private sector representatives, and the public;

Include in the report a record of the trends, long-term implications, and reactions, to be completed by December 31 of even-numbered years and presented to the General Assembly, to the Governor, and to the public; and

The biennial trends report shall be given affirmative consideration by the agencies and branches of state government when those agencies and branches are determining budget priorities;

Identify long-term issues significant to the Commonwealth by using a methodology involving a broad spectrum of citizens and establish annual work plans focusing on the priority issues approved by the board. Studies shall include the potential long-term effects of current trends and policies and shall identify future policy options;

Periodically prepare a report on alternative futures facing the Commonwealth for a five (5) or ten (10) year period, or for a period deemed appropriate by the board;

Advise the General Assembly and the Governor of potential long-term effects of government policies;

Develop an information process to inform the public continually on long-term issues, critical trends, and alternative futures;

Develop a database for trend identification.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 103, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 2001, ch. 136, § 2, effective June 21, 2001.

7B.070.
Coordination by center of long-term planning — Relationships with state agencies — Use of center’s findings and recommendations.

The center shall serve as a mechanism for coordinating resources and groups to focus on long-term planning;

The center shall solicit input from the Legislative Research Commission, the Governor’s Office for Policy and Management, universities, the private sector and the public, including local governments and area development districts;

The Governor’s Office for Policy and Management and the Legislative Research Commission shall biennially submit to the center a list of issues solicited from the program cabinets of the executive branch and co-chairs of interim legislative committees, respectively. The center shall include these issues in its broad-based efforts to determine priority study areas;

A representative from the Governor’s Office for Policy and Management and a legislator appointed by the Legislative Research Commission shall be invited to serve on each advisory committee;

The board may enter into agreements with state agencies and institutions of higher education to provide staff on a time-limited basis for specific research projects;

The center shall:

Ensure that if departments or agencies of state government have responsibilities in an area of policy under study, they are encouraged to comment on the potential effects of government policies on critical trends and alternative futures;

Consider the comments of the departments and agencies in performing its duties under this chapter; and

Include the official comments of the departments and agencies in any report provided to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission.

Findings and recommendations in the studies of the center shall be delivered to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the appropriate agency and interim committee. The head of the state agency or program to which the report pertains and the co-chairs of the interim legislative committees with jurisdiction shall give affirmative consideration to the report by a written response to the center within sixty (60) days, stating the action that shall be taken in response to the report.

As the branches propose drafts of uniform forms to be used by all budget units pursuant to KRS 48.040(1), they shall provide for the affirmative consideration of the trends set forth by the biennial trends report of the center;

As the Legislative Research Commission prescribes the uniform forms, records, and instructions to be used by branch budget units, it shall incorporate a requirement that agencies explain how their budget priorities address the trends and long-term policy implications set forth in the biennial trends report of the center.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 103, § 7, effective July 14, 1992.

7B.080.
Kentucky Long-Term Policy Research Center fund — Investment of moneys — Appropriations.

The operation of the center shall be funded from the restricted agency fund established in subsection (3) of this section.

There is hereby established a fiduciary fund to be entitled the Kentucky Long-Term Policy Research Center fund. The fund may receive appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds. Moneys in the fund shall not lapse back to the General Fund at the end of any fiscal year. Moneys in the fund shall be invested by the Office of Financial Management within the Office of the Controller, consistent with the provisions of KRS Chapter 42.

A restricted agency fund account is established to receive the interest on the fiduciary fund and any other resources made available to the center. Interest from the fiduciary fund shall be credited to the restricted agency fund account on a monthly basis for the center’s operations. Moneys in the account shall be invested by the Office of Financial Management within the Office of the Controller, consistent with the provisions of KRS Chapter 42.

Any appropriation by the General Assembly to the fiduciary fund shall remain intact and shall not be available to the board, and should the center and its functions terminate, the principal and any remaining interest from other accumulated funds shall revert to the general fund of the Commonwealth or to the donor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 103, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 46, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 25, effective June 20, 2005.

7B.090.
Short title for KRS 7B.010 to 7B.090.

KRS

7B.010

to

7B.090

may be cited as the Rose-Blandford Long-Term Policy Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 103, § 9, effective July 14, 1992.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Legislative Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 200, Pt. I, A, 1, (3) at 1764.